California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this section by means of policy letters or similar instructions, without taking further regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 286, Sec. 7.   (SB 335)   Effective September 16, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 14169.13 (subd. (c), para. (1)) and 14169.40, or on date prescribed in Section 14169.16.   Repealed on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Section 14169.16.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.11.

The department shall make disbursements from the Hospital Quality Assurance Revenue Fund consistent with the following:

(a) Fund disbursements shall be made periodically within 15 days of each date on which quality assurance fees are due from hospitals.

(b) The funds
 shall be disbursed in accordance with the order of priority set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 14169.33, except that funds may be set aside for increased capitation payments to managed care health plans pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 14169.5.

(c) The funds shall be disbursed in each payment cycle in accordance with the order of priority set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 14169.33 as modified by subdivision (b), and so that the supplemental payments and grants to hospitals, increased capitation payments to managed health care plans, increased payments to mental health plans, direct payments to hospitals of acute psychiatric supplemental payments, and supplemental payments for out-of-network emergency and poststabilization services for the Low Income Health Program are made to the maximum extent for which funds are available.

(d) To the maximum extent possible,
 consistent with the availability of funds in the quality assurance fund and the timing of federal approvals, the supplemental payments and grants to hospitals, increased capitation payments to managed health care plans, and increased payments to mental health plans under this article shall be made before December 31, 2013, except that supplemental payments for out-of-network emergency and poststabilization services for the Low Income Health Program shall be made before April 1, 2014.

(e) The aggregate amount of funds to be disbursed to private hospitals shall be determined under Sections 14169.2 and 14169.3. The aggregate amount of funds to be disbursed to managed health care plans shall be determined under Section 14169.5. The aggregate amount of direct grants to designated and nondesignated public hospitals shall be determined under Section 14169.7. The aggregate amount of supplemental payments to be disbursed to private hospitals for
 out-of-network and poststabilization services for the Low Income Health Program shall be determined under Section 14169.7.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 452, Sec. 6.   (SB 920)   Effective September 22, 2012.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 14169.13 (subd. (c), para. (1)) and 14169.40, or on date prescribed in Section 14169.16.   Repealed on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Section 14169.16.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.12.

(a) Exclusive of payments made under Article 5.21 (commencing with Section 14167.1) and Article 5.226 (commencing with Section 14168.1), payment rates for hospital outpatient services, furnished by private hospitals, nondesignated public hospitals, and designated public hospitals before December 31, 2013, exclusive of amounts payable under this article, shall not be reduced below
 the rates in effect on July 1, 2011.

(b) Rates payable to hospitals for hospital inpatient services furnished before December 31, 2013, under contracts negotiated pursuant to the selective provider contracting program under Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081), shall not be reduced below the contract rates in effect on July 1, 2011. This subdivision shall not prohibit changes to the supplemental payments paid to individual hospitals under Sections 14166.12, 14166.17, and 14166.23, provided that the aggregate amount of the payments for each subject fiscal year is not less than the minimum amount permitted under Section 14167.13.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 14105.281, exclusive of payments made under Article 5.21 (commencing with Section 14167.1) and Article 5.226 (commencing with Section 14168.1), payments to private hospitals for hospital inpatient services furnished before
 January 1, 2014, that are not reimbursed under a contract negotiated pursuant to the selective provider contracting program under Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081), exclusive of amounts payable under this article, shall not be less than the amount of payments that would have been made under the payment methodology in effect on the effective date of this article.

(d) Upon the implementation of the new Medi-Cal inpatient hospital reimbursement methodology based on diagnosis-related groups pursuant to Section 14105.28, the requirements in subdivisions (b) and (c) shall be met if the rates paid under the new Medi-Cal inpatient hospital reimbursement methodology based on diagnosis-related groups result in an average payment per discharge to all hospitals subject to the new reimbursement methodology, calculated on an aggregate basis per subject fiscal year, exclusive of amounts payable under this article, amounts payable under Sections
 14166.11 and 14166.23, and if amounts payable under Sections 14166.12 and 14166.17 are not included in the payments under the diagnosis-related group methodology and continue to be paid separately to hospitals, exclusive of those amounts, that is not less than the average payment per discharge to the hospitals, exclusive of amounts payable under this article, amounts payable under Sections 14166.11 and 14166.23, and if amounts payable under Sections 14166.12 and 14166.17 are not included in the payments under the diagnosis-related group methodology and continue to be paid separately to hospitals, exclusive of those amounts, calculated on an aggregate basis for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2012, adjusted, in consultation with the hospital community, to reflect the movement of populations into managed care under Article 5.4 (commencing with Section 14180).

(e) Solely for purposes of this article, a rate reduction or a change in a rate
 methodology that is enjoined by a court shall be included in the determination of a rate or a rate methodology until all appeals or judicial reviews have been exhausted and the rate reduction or change in rate methodology has been permanently enjoined, denied by the federal government, or otherwise permanently prevented from being implemented.

(f) Disproportionate share replacement payments to private hospitals for the 2011–12 fiscal year shall be not less than the amount determined pursuant to Section 14166.11 as reduced pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 14166.115. Disproportionate share replacement payments to private hospitals for the 2012–13 fiscal year shall not be less than the amount determined pursuant to Section 14166.11, as reduced pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 14166.115. Disproportionate share replacement payments to private hospitals for the period of July 1, 2013, through December 31,
 2013, shall be not less than the amount determined pursuant to Section 14166.11, as reduced by paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 14166.115. For purposes of this subdivision, references to Section 14166.11 are to the version of Section 14166.11 in effect on the effective date of the act that added this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 286, Sec. 7.   (SB 335)   Effective September 16, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 14169.13 (subd. (c), para. (1)) and 14169.40, or on date prescribed in Section 14169.16.   Repealed on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Section 14169.16.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.13.

(a) The director shall do all of the following:

(1) Promptly submit any state plan amendment or waiver request that may be necessary to implement this article.

(2) Promptly seek federal approvals or waivers as may be necessary to implement this
 article and to obtain federal financial participation to the maximum extent possible for the payments under this article.

(3) Amend the contracts between the managed health care plans and the department as necessary to incorporate the provisions of Sections 14169.5 and 14169.6 and promptly seek all necessary federal approvals of those amendments. The department shall pursue amendments to the contracts as soon as possible after the effective date of this article and Article 5.229 (commencing with Section 14169.31), and shall not wait for federal approval of this article or Article 5.229 (commencing with Section 14169.31) prior to pursuing amendments to the contracts. The amendments to the contracts shall, among other provisions, set forth an agreement to increase capitation payments to managed health care plans under Section 14169.5 and increase payments to hospitals under Section 14169.6 in a manner that relates back to July 1, 2011, or as soon
 thereafter as possible, conditioned on obtaining all federal approvals necessary for federal financial participation for the increased capitation payments to the managed health care plans.

(b) In implementing this article, the department may utilize the services of the Medi-Cal fiscal intermediary through a change order to the fiscal intermediary contract to administer this program, consistent with the requirements of Sections 14104.6, 14104.7, 14104.8, and 14104.9. Contracts entered into for purposes of implementing this article or Article 5.229 (commencing with Section 14169.31) shall not be subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(c) This article shall become inoperative if either of the following occurs:

(1) In the event, and on the effective date, of a final
 judicial determination made by any court of appellate jurisdiction or a final determination by the federal Department of Health and Human Services or the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that Section 14169.2, Section 14169.3, or any provision of Section 14166.115 cannot be implemented.

(2) In the event both of the following conditions exist:

(A) The federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services denies approval for, or does not approve before January 1, 2013, the implementation of Section 14169.2, Section 14169.3, or the quality assurance fee established pursuant to Article 5.229 (commencing with Section 14169.31).

(B) Section 14169.2, Section 14169.3, or Article 5.229 (commencing with Section 14169.31) cannot be modified by the department pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 14169.33 in
 order to meet the requirements of federal law or to obtain federal approval.

(d) If this article becomes inoperative pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) and the determination applies to any period or periods of time prior to the effective date of the determination, the department shall have authority to recoup all payments made pursuant to this article during that period or those periods of time.

(e) In the event any hospital, or any party on behalf of a hospital, shall initiate a case or proceeding in any state or federal court in which the hospital seeks any relief of any sort whatsoever, including, but not limited to, monetary relief, injunctive relief, declaratory relief, or a writ, based in whole or in part on a contention that any or all of this article or Article 5.229 (commencing with Section 14169.31) is unlawful and may not be lawfully implemented, both of the
 following shall apply:

(1) Payments shall not be made to the hospital pursuant to this article until the case or proceeding is finally resolved, including the final disposition of all appeals.

(2) Any amount computed to be payable to the hospital pursuant to this section for a project year shall be withheld by the department and shall be paid to the hospital only after the case or proceeding is finally resolved, including the final disposition of all appeals.

(f) Subject to Section 14169.34, no payment shall be made under this article until all necessary federal approvals for the payment and for the fee provisions in Article 5.229 (commencing with Section 14169.31) have been obtained and the fee has been imposed and collected. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, payments under this article shall be made only
 to the extent that the fee established in Article 5.229 (commencing with Section 14169.31) is collected and available to cover the nonfederal share of the payments.

(g) A hospital’s receipt of payments under this article for services rendered prior to the effective date of this article is conditioned on the hospital’s continued participation in Medi-Cal for at least 30 days after the effective date of this article.

(h) All payments made by the department to hospitals, managed health care plans, and mental health plans under this article shall be made only from the following:

(1) The quality assurance fee set forth in Article 5.229 (commencing with Section 14169.31) and due and payable on or before December 31, 2013, along with any interest or other investment income thereon.

(2) Federal reimbursement and any other related federal funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 23, Sec. 101.   (AB 1467)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in this section (subd. (c), para. (1)) and Section 14169.40, or on date prescribed in Section 14169.16.   Repealed on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Section 14169.16.   Note: Provisions for inoperation affect Article 5.228, commencing with Section 14169.1.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.14.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article or Article 5.229 (commencing with Section 14169.31), the director may proportionately reduce the amount of any supplemental payments or increased capitation payments under this article to the extent that the payment would result in the reduction of other amounts payable to a hospital or managed health care plan or mental health plan due to the
 application of federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 286, Sec. 7.   (SB 335)   Effective September 16, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 14169.13 (subd. (c), para. (1)) and 14169.40, or on date prescribed in Section 14169.16.   Repealed on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Section 14169.16.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.15.

The director may, pursuant to Section 14169.40, decide not to implement or to discontinue implementation of this article and Article 5.229 (commencing with Section 14169.31), and to retroactively invalidate the requirements for supplemental payments or other payments under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 286, Sec. 7.   (SB 335)   Effective September 16, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 14169.13 (subd. (c), para. (1)) and 14169.40, or on date prescribed in Section 14169.16.   Repealed on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Section 14169.16.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.16.

(a) This article shall remain operative only until the later of the following:

(1) January 1, 2015.

(2) The date of the last payment of the quality assurance fee payments pursuant to Article 5.229 (commencing Section 14169.31).

(3) The date of the last payment from the department pursuant to this article.

(b) If this article becomes inoperative under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), this article shall be repealed on January 1, 2015, unless a later enacted statute enacted before that date, deletes or extends that date.

(c) If this article becomes inoperative under paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a), this article shall be repealed on January 1 of the year following the date this article becomes inoperative, unless a later enacted statute enacted before that date, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 452, Sec. 7.   (SB 920)   Effective September 22, 2012.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 14169.13 (subd. (c), para. (1)) and 14169.40, or on date prescribed in this section.   Repealed on or after January 1, 2015, by its own provisions.   Note: Termination provisions affect Article 5.228, commencing with Section 14169.1.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.17.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if federal approval or a letter that indicates likely federal approval in accordance with Section 14169.34 has not been received on or before December 1, 2013, then this article shall become inoperative, and as of December 1, 2013, is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before December 1, 2013, deletes or extends that
 date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 452, Sec. 8.   (SB 920)   Effective September 22, 2012.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 14169.13 (subd. (c), para. (1)) and 14169.40, or on date prescribed in Section 14169.16.   Repealed on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Section 14169.16.   Note: Conditions in this section for repeal of Article 5.228 (commencing with Section 14169.1) failed.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.17.5.

Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall implement this article by means of policy letters or similar instructions, without taking further regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 286, Sec. 7.   (SB 335)   Effective September 16, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 14169.13 (subd. (c), para. (1)) and 14169.40, or on date prescribed in Section 14169.16.   Repealed on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Section 14169.16.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.18.

If the director determines that this article has become inoperative pursuant to Section 14169.13, 14169.16, 14169.17, or 14169.40, the director shall execute a declaration stating that this determination has been made and stating the basis for this determination. The director shall retain the declaration and provide a copy, within five working days of the execution of the declaration, to the fiscal
 and appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. In addition, the director shall post the declaration on the department’s Internet Web site and the director shall send the declaration to the Secretary of State, the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, and the Legislative Counsel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 452, Sec. 9.   (SB 920)   Effective September 22, 2012.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 14169.13 (subd. (c), para. (1)) and 14169.40, or on date prescribed in Section 14169.16.   Repealed on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Section 14169.16.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.19.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to consider legislation requiring the director to seek approval to increase payments to hospitals in accordance with subdivision (b) of Section 14169.2, subdivision (a) of Section 14169.3, and subdivision (c) of Section 14169.5, and to adopt a corresponding increase in the fee imposed pursuant to Article 5.229 (commencing with Section
 14169.31), consistent with federal law and regulations, if the director determines that the maximum available upper payment limits in subdivision (b) of Section 14169.2 or subdivision (a) of Section 14169.3, or the amount of federal financial participation for increased capitation payments to managed care health plans in subdivision (c) of Section 14169.5, have increased during the program period.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the legislation described in subdivision (a) shall do both of the following:

(1) Require the director to work in consultation with the hospital community in seeking any necessary approvals from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to increase payments to hospitals and to impose corresponding fee increases.

(2) Require that, in the event that the director
 determines that the maximum available upper payment limits in subdivision (b) of Section 14169.2 or subdivision (a) of Section 14169.3, or the amount of federal financial participation for increased capitation payments to managed care health plans in subdivision (c) of Section 14169.5, have increased during the program period, the increases shall first be made available for the purposes of this section prior to being used for other purposes.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article or Article 5.229 (commencing with Section 14169.31), failure to secure, or denial of, any necessary federal approvals required by the legislation described in subdivision (a) shall not affect implementation of this article or Article 5.229 (commencing with Section 14169.31).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 286, Sec. 7.   (SB 335)   Effective September 16, 2011.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 14169.13 (subd. (c), para. (1)) and 14169.40, or on date prescribed in Section 14169.16.   Repealed on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Section 14169.16.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5.229. Private Hospital Quality Assurance Fee Act of 2011 [14169.31. - 14169.42.]

14169.31.

For the purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) (1) “Aggregate quality assurance fee” means, with respect to a hospital that is not a prepaid health plan hospital, the sum of all of the following:

(A) The annual
 fee-for-service days for an individual hospital multiplied by the fee-for-service per diem quality assurance fee rate.

(B) The annual managed care days for an individual hospital multiplied by the managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate.

(C) The annual Medi-Cal days for an individual hospital multiplied by the Medi-Cal per diem quality assurance fee rate.

(2) “Aggregate quality assurance fee” means, with respect to a hospital that is a prepaid health plan hospital, the sum of all of the following:

(A) The annual fee-for-service days for an individual hospital multiplied by the fee-for-service per diem quality assurance fee rate.

(B) The annual managed care days for an individual
 hospital multiplied by the prepaid health plan hospital managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate.

(C) The annual Medi-Cal managed care days for an individual hospital multiplied by the prepaid health plan hospital Medi-Cal managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate.

(D) The annual Medi-Cal fee-for-service days for an individual hospital multiplied by the Medi-Cal per diem quality assurance fee rate.

(3) “Aggregate quality assurance fee after the application of the fee percentage” means the aggregate quality assurance fee multiplied by the fee percentage for each subject fiscal year.

(b) “Annual fee-for-service days” means the number of fee-for-service days of each hospital subject to the quality assurance fee, as reported on the days data
 source.

(c) “Annual managed care days” means the number of managed care days of each hospital subject to the quality assurance fee, as reported on the days data source.

(d) “Annual Medi-Cal days” means the number of Medi-Cal days of each hospital subject to the quality assurance fee, as reported on the days data source.

(e) “Converted hospital” shall mean a hospital described in subdivision (b) of Section 14169.1.

(f) “Days data source” means the hospital’s Annual Financial Disclosure Report filed with the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development as of May 5, 2011, for its fiscal year ending during 2009.

(g) “Designated public hospital” shall have the meaning given in
 subdivision (d) of Section 14166.1 as of January 1, 2011.

(h) “Exempt facility” means any of the following:

(1) A public hospital, which shall include either of the following:

(A) A hospital, as defined in paragraph (25) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98.

(B) A tax-exempt nonprofit hospital that is licensed under subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code and operating a hospital owned by a local health care district, and is affiliated with the health care district hospital owner by means of the district’s status as the nonprofit corporation’s sole corporate member.

(2) With the exception of a hospital that is in the Charitable Research Hospital peer group, as set
 forth in the 1991 Hospital Peer Grouping Report published by the department, a hospital that is a hospital designated as a specialty hospital in the hospital’s Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development Hospital Annual Financial Disclosure Report for the hospital’s fiscal year ending in the 2009 calendar year.

(3) A hospital that satisfies the Medicare criteria to be a long-term care hospital.

(4) A small and rural hospital as specified in Section 124840 of the Health and Safety Code designated as that in the hospital’s Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development Hospital Annual Financial Disclosure Report for the hospital’s fiscal year ending in the 2009 calendar year.

(i) “Federal approval” means the approval by the federal government of both the quality assurance fee established pursuant to this
 article and the supplemental payments to private hospitals described in Sections 14169.2 and 14169.3.

(j) (1) “Fee-for-service per diem quality assurance fee rate” means a fixed daily fee on fee-for-service days.

(2) The fee-for-service per diem quality assurance fee rate shall be three hundred eight dollars and thirty-six cents ($308.36) per day.

(3) Upon federal approval or conditional federal approval described in Section 14169.34, the director shall determine the fee-for-service per diem quality assurance fee rate based on the funds required to make the payments specified in Article 5.228 (commencing with Section 14169.1), in consultation with the hospital community.

(k) “Fee-for-service days” means inpatient hospital days
 where the service type is reported as “acute care,” “psychiatric care,” and “rehabilitation care,” and the payer category is reported as “Medicare traditional,” “county indigent programs-traditional,” “other third parties-traditional,” “other indigent,” and “other payers,” for purposes of the Annual Financial Disclosure Report submitted by hospitals to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(l) “Fee percentage” means a fraction, expressed as a percentage, the numerator of which is the amount of payments for each subject fiscal year under Sections 14169.2, 14169.3, 14169.5, and 14169.7.5, for which federal financial participation is available and the denominator of which is four billion eight hundred sixty-six million seven hundred four thousand one hundred fifteen dollars ($4,866,704,115).

(m) “General acute care hospital” means any hospital licensed pursuant to
 subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(n) “Hospital community” means any hospital industry organization or system that represents hospitals.

(o) “Managed care days” means inpatient hospital days where the service type is reported as “acute care,” “psychiatric care,” and “rehabilitation care,” and the payer category is reported as “Medicare managed care,” “county indigent programs-managed care,” and “other third parties-managed care,” for purposes of the Annual Financial Disclosure Report submitted by hospitals to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(p) “Managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate” means a fixed fee on managed care days of eighty-six dollars and forty cents ($86.40) per day.

(q) “Medi-Cal days” means inpatient hospital days where the service type is reported as “acute care,” “psychiatric care,” and “rehabilitation care,” and the payer category is reported as “Medi-Cal traditional” and “Medi-Cal managed care,” for purposes of the Annual Financial Disclosure Report submitted by hospitals to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(r) “Medi-Cal fee-for-service days” means inpatient hospital days where the service type is reported as “acute care,” “psychiatric care,” and “rehabilitation care,” and the payer category is reported as “Medi-Cal traditional” for purposes of the Annual Financial Disclosure Report submitted by hospitals to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(s) “Medi-Cal managed care days” means inpatient hospital days as reported on the days data source where the service type is reported as
 “acute care,” “psychiatric care,” and “rehabilitation care,” and the payer category is reported as “Medi-Cal managed care” for purposes of the Annual Financial Disclosure Report submitted by hospitals to the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.

(t) “Medi-Cal per diem quality assurance fee rate” means a fixed fee on Medi-Cal days of three hundred eighty-three dollars and twenty cents ($383.20) per day.

(u) “New hospital” means a hospital operation, business, or facility functioning under current or prior ownership as a private hospital that does not have a days data source or a hospital that has a days data source in whole, or in part, from a previous operator where there is an outstanding monetary liability owed to the state in connection with the Medi-Cal program and the new operator did not assume liability for the outstanding monetary obligation.

(v) “Nondesignated public hospital” means either of the following:

(1) A public hospital that is licensed under subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, is not designated as a specialty hospital in the hospital’s Annual Financial Disclosure Report for the hospital’s latest fiscal year ending in 2009, and satisfies the definition in paragraph (25) of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98, excluding designated public hospitals.

(2) A tax-exempt nonprofit hospital that is licensed under subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, is not designated as a specialty hospital in the hospital’s Annual Financial Disclosure Report for the hospital’s latest fiscal year ending in 2009, is operating a hospital owned by a local health care district, and is affiliated with the health care district
 hospital owner by means of the district’s status as the nonprofit corporation’s sole corporate member.

(w) “Prepaid health plan hospital” means a hospital owned by a nonprofit public benefit corporation that shares a common board of directors with a nonprofit health care service plan.

(x) “Prepaid health plan hospital managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate” means a fixed fee on non-Medi-Cal managed care days for prepaid health plan hospitals of forty-eight dollars and thirty-eight cents ($48.38) per day.

(y) “Prepaid health plan hospital Medi-Cal managed care per diem quality assurance fee rate” means a fixed fee on Medi-Cal managed care days for prepaid health plan hospitals of two hundred fourteen dollars and fifty-nine cents ($214.59) per day.

(z) “Prior fiscal year data” means any data taken from sources that the department determines are the most accurate and reliable at the time the determination is made, or may be calculated from the most recent audited data using appropriate update factors. The data may be from prior fiscal years, current fiscal years, or projections of future fiscal years.

(aa) “Private hospital” means a hospital that meets all of the following conditions:

(1) Is licensed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Is in the Charitable Research Hospital peer group, as set forth in the 1991 Hospital Peer Grouping Report published by the department, or is not designated as a specialty hospital in the hospital’s Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development Annual Financial
 Disclosure Report for the hospital’s latest fiscal year ending in 2009.

(3) Does not satisfy the Medicare criteria to be classified as a long-term care hospital.

(4) Is a nonpublic hospital, nonpublic converted hospital, or converted hospital as those terms are defined in paragraphs (26) to (28), inclusive, respectively, of subdivision (a) of Section 14105.98.

(ab) “Program period” means the period from July 1, 2011, to December 31, 2013, inclusive.

(ac) “Subject fiscal quarter” means a state fiscal quarter during the program period.

(ad) “Subject fiscal year” means a state fiscal year that ends after July 1, 2011, and begins before January 1, 2014.

(ae) “Upper payment limit” means a federal upper payment limit on the amount of the Medicaid payment for which federal financial participation is available for a class of service and a class of health care providers, as specified in Part 447 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The applicable upper payment limit shall be separately calculated for inpatient and outpatient hospital services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 452, Sec. 10.   (SB 920)   Effective September 22, 2012.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 14169.38 (subd. (d), para. (1)) and 14169.40, or on date prescribed in Section 14169.41.   Repealed on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Section 14169.41.)
-------------------------------------------

14169.32.

(a) There shall be imposed on each general acute care hospital that is not an exempt facility a quality assurance fee, provided that a quality assurance fee under this article shall not be imposed on a converted hospital.

(b) The quality assurance fee shall be computed starting on July 1, 2011, and continue through and including December 31, 2013.

(c) Subject to Section 14169.34, upon receipt of federal approval, the following shall become operative:

(1) Within 10 business days following receipt of the notice of federal approval from the federal government, the department shall send notice to each hospital subject to the quality
 assurance fee, and publish on its Internet Web site, the following information:

(A) The date that the state received notice of federal approval.

(B) The fee percentage for each subject fiscal year.

(2) The notice to each hospital subject to the quality assurance fee shall also state the following:

(A) The aggregate quality assurance fee after the application of the fee percentage for each subject fiscal year.

(B) The aggregate quality assurance fee.

(C) The amount of each payment due from the hospital with respect to the aggregate quality assurance fee.

(D) The
 date on which each payment is due.

(3) The hospitals shall pay the aggregate quality assurance fee after application of the fee percentage for all subject fiscal years in 10 installments. The department shall establish the date that each installment is due, provided that the first installment shall be due no earlier than 20 days following the department sending the notice pursuant to paragraph (1), and the installments shall be paid at least one month apart, but if possible, the installments shall be paid on a quarterly basis.

(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the amount of each hospital’s aggregate quality assurance fee after the application of the fee percentage for each subject fiscal year that has not been paid by the hospital before December 15, 2013, pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (8), shall be paid by the hospital no later than December 15, 2013.

(5) (A) Notwithstanding subdivision (l) of Section 14169.31, for the purpose of determining the installments under paragraph (3), the department shall use an interim fee percentage as follows:

(i) One hundred percent for subject fiscal year 2011–12 until the federal government has approved or disapproved additional capitation payments described in Section 14169.5 for that subject fiscal year.

(ii) One hundred percent for subject fiscal year 2012–13 until the federal government has approved or disapproved additional capitation payments described in Section 14169.5 for that subject fiscal year.

(iii) Fifty percent for subject fiscal year 2013–14 until the federal government has approved or disapproved additional capitation payments
 described in Section 14169.5 for that subject fiscal year.

(B) The director may use a lower interim fee percentage for each subject fiscal year under this paragraph as the director, in his or her discretion, determines is reasonable in order to generate sufficient but not excessive installment payments to make the payments described in subdivision (b) of Section 14169.33.

(6) The director shall determine the final fee percentage for each subject fiscal year within 15 days of the approval or disapproval, in whole or in part, by the federal government of all changes to the capitation rates of managed health care plans requested by the department to implement Section 14169.5 for that subject fiscal year, but in no event later than December 1, 2013. At the time the director determines the final fee percentage for a subject fiscal year, the director shall also determine the amount of
 future installment payments of the quality assurance fee for each hospital subject to the fee, if any are due. The amount of each future installment payment shall be established by the director with the objective that the total of the installment payments of the quality assurance fee due from a hospital shall equal the director’s estimate for each subject fiscal year for the hospital of the aggregate quality assurance fee after the application of the fee percentage.

(7) The director, within 15 days of determining the final fee percentage for a subject fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (6), shall send notice to each hospital subject to the quality assurance fee of the following information:

(A) The final fee percentage for each subject fiscal year for which the final fee percentage has been determined.

(B) The fee
 percentage determined under paragraph (5) for each subject fiscal year for which the final fee percentage has not been determined.

(C) The aggregate quality assurance fee after application of the fee percentage for each subject fiscal year.

(D) The director’s estimate of total quality assurance fee payments due from the hospital under this article whether or not paid. This amount shall be the sum of the aggregate quality assurance fee after application of the fee percentage for each subject fiscal year using the fee percentages contained in the notice.

(E) The total quality assurance fee payments that the hospital has made under this article.

(F) The amount, if any, by which the total quality assurance fee payments due from the hospital under this
 article as described in subparagraph (C) exceed the total quality assurance fee payments that the hospital has made under this article.

(G) The amount of each remaining installment of the quality assurance fee, if any, due from the hospital and the date each installment is due. This amount shall be the amount described in subparagraph (F) divided by the number of installment payments remaining.

(8) Each hospital that is sent a notice under paragraph (7) shall pay the additional installments of the quality assurance fee that are due, if any, in the amounts and at the times set forth in the notice unless superseded by a subsequent notice from the department.

(9) The department shall refund to a hospital paying the quality assurance fee the amount, if any, by which the total quality assurance fee payments that the